Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2016
Hospital and Medical Facilities Fund; State Treasurer; disbursement by warrants; funds; investment.

The State Treasurer is hereby authorized to receive federal funds and transmit them to such applicants or to the department, if to carry out any survey, administration, or other authorized function. There is hereby established, separate and apart from all public money and funds of this state, a Hospital and Medical Facilities Fund. Money from the federal government for any authorized purpose of survey, planning, administration, or construction of approved projects, shall be received by the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Warrants for all payments from the fund shall be drawn and paid in the manner provided by law. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1947, c. 232, § 16, p. 738;

Laws 1965, c. 421, § 11, p. 1353;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 71, p. 2388;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 75.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.